Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5323
Loans; eligibility.

Loans shall be made only to owners of eligible systems for eligible projects pursuant to the Safe Drinking Water Act.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 12.